Missouri, session 2026, HB2538.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 208.080 and 208.156, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 208.080 and 208.156, to read as follows:
208.080. 1. Any applicant for or recipient of benefits or services provided by law by
the family support division, children's division, [or] MO HealthNet division, or Missouri
Medicaid audit and compliance unitmay appeal to the director of the respective division or
unit from a decision in any of the following cases:
(1) If his or her right to make application for any such benefits or services is denied;
or
(2) If his or her application is disallowed in whole or in part, or is not acted upon
within a reasonable time after it is filed; or
(3) If it is proposed to cancel or modify benefits or services; or
(4) If he or she is adversely affected by any determination of the family support
division, children's division, [or] MO HealthNet division, or Missouri Medicaid audit and
compliance unit in the administration of the programs administered by such divisions or
unit; or
(5) If a determination is made pursuant to subsection 2 of section 208.180 that
payment of benefits on behalf of a dependent child shall not be made to the relative with
whom he or she lives.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2538 2
2. If a division or unitproposes to terminate or modify the payment of benefits or the
providing of services to the recipient or a division or unit has terminated or modified the
payment of benefits or providing of services to the recipient and the recipient appeals, the
decision of the director as to the eligibility of the recipient at the time such action was
proposed or taken shall be based on the facts shown by the evidence presented at the hearing
of the appeal to have existed at the time such action to terminate or modify was proposed or
was taken.
3. In the case of a proposed action by the family support division, children's division,
[or] MO HealthNet division, or Missouri Medicaid audit and compliance unit to reduce,
modify, or discontinue benefits or services to a recipient, the recipient of such benefits or
services shall have ten days from the date of the mailing of notice of the proposed action to
reduce, modify, or discontinue benefits or services within which to request an appeal to the
director of the division or unit. In the notice to the recipient of such proposed action, the
appropriate division or unit shall notify the recipient of all his or her rights of appeal under
this section. Proper blank forms for appeal to the director of the division or unit shall be
furnished by the appropriate division or unitto any aggrieved recipient. Every such appeal to
the director of the division or unit shall be transmitted by the appropriate division or unit
immediately upon the same being filed with the appropriate division or unit. If an appeal is
requested, benefits or services shall continue undiminished or unchanged until such appeal is
heard and a decision has been rendered thereon, except that in an aid to families with
dependent children case the recipient may request that benefits or services not be continued
undiminished or unchanged during the appeal.
4. When a case has been closed or modified and no appeal was requested prior to
closing or modification, the recipient shall have ninety days from the date of closing or
modification to request an appeal to the director of the division or unit. Each recipient who
has not requested an appeal prior to the closing or modification of his or her case shall be
notified at the time of such closing or modification of his or her right to request an appeal
during this ninety-day period. Proper blank forms for requesting an appeal to the director of
the division or unit shall be furnished by the appropriate division or unit to any aggrieved
applicant. Every such request made in any manner for an appeal to the director of the division
or unit shall be transmitted by the appropriate division or unit to the director of the division
or unit immediately upon the same being filed with the appropriate division or unit. If an
appeal is requested in the ninety-day period subsequent to the closing or modification,
benefits or services shall not be continued at their prior level during the pendency of the
appeal.
5. In the case of a rejection of an application for benefits or services, the aggrieved
applicant shall have ninety days from the date of the notice of the action in which to request

HB 2538 3
an appeal to the director of the division or unit. In the rejection notice the applicant for
benefits or services shall be notified of all of his or her rights of appeal under this section.
Proper blank forms for requesting an appeal to the director of the division or unit shall be
furnished by the appropriate division or unit to any aggrieved applicant. Any such request
made in any manner for an appeal shall be transmitted by the appropriate division or unit to
the director of the division or unit, immediately upon the same being filed with the
appropriate division or unit.
6. If the division or unit has rejected an application for benefits or services and the
applicant appeals, the decision of the director as to the eligibility of the applicant at the time
such rejection was made shall be based upon the facts shown by the evidence presented at the
hearing of the appeal to have existed at the time the rejection was made.
7. The director of the division or unit shall give the applicant for benefits or services
or the recipient of benefits or services reasonable notice of, and an opportunity for, a fair
hearing in the county of his or her residence at the time the adverse action was taken. The
hearing shall be conducted by the director of the division or unit or such director's designee.
Every applicant or recipient, on appeal to the director of the division or unit, shall be entitled
to be present at the hearing, in person and by attorney or representative, and shall be entitled
to introduce into the record of such hearing any and all evidence, by witnesses or otherwise,
pertinent to such applicant's or recipient's eligibility between the time he or she applied for
benefits or services and the time the application was denied or the benefits or services were
terminated or modified, and all such evidence shall be taken down, preserved, and shall
become a part of the applicant's or recipient's appeal record. Upon the record so made, the
director of the division or unitshall determine all questions presented by the appeal, and shall
make such decision as to the granting of benefits or services as in his or her opinion is
justified and is in conformity with the provisions of the law. The director shall clearly state
the reasons for his or her decision and shall include a statement of findings of fact and
conclusions of law pertinent to the questions in issue.
8. All appeal requests may initially be made orally or in any written form, but all such
requests shall be transcribed on forms furnished by the division or unit and signed by the
aggrieved applicant or recipient or his or her representative prior to the commencement of the
hearing.
208.156. 1. The family support division or the MO HealthNet division shall provide
for granting an opportunity for a fair hearing under section 208.080 to any applicant or
recipient whose claim for medical assistance is denied or is not acted upon with reasonable
promptness.
2. Any person authorized under section 208.153 to provide services for which benefit
payments are authorized under section 208.152 whose claim for reimbursement for such

HB 2538 4
services is denied or is not acted upon with reasonable promptness shall be entitled to a
hearing before the administrative hearing commission pursuant to the provisions of chapter
621.
3. Any person authorized under section 208.153 to provide services for which benefit
payments are authorized under section 208.152 who is denied participation in any program or
programs established under the provisions of chapter 208 shall be entitled to a hearing before
the administrative hearing commission pursuant to the provisions of chapter 621.
4. Any person authorized under section 208.153 to provide services for which benefit
payments are authorized under section 208.152 who is aggrieved by any rule or regulation
promulgated by the department of social services or any division or unit therein shall be
entitled to a hearing before the administrative hearing commission pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 621.
5. Any person authorized under section 208.153 to provide services for which benefit
payments are authorized under section 208.152 who is aggrieved by any rule or regulation,
contractual agreement, or decision, as provided for in section 208.166, by the department of
social services or any division or unit therein shall be entitled to a hearing before the
administrative hearing commission pursuant to the provisions of chapter 621.
6. No provider of service may file a petition for a hearing before the administrative
hearing commission unless the amount for which he or sheseeks reimbursement exceeds five
hundred dollars.
7. One or more providers of service as will fairly insure adequate representation of
others having similar claims against the department of social services or any division or unit
therein may institute the hearing on behalf of all in the class if there is a common question of
law or fact affecting the several rights and a common relief is sought.
8. Any person authorized under section 208.153 to provide services for which benefit
payments are authorized under section 208.152 and who is entitled to a hearing as provided
for in the preceding sections shall have thirty days from the date of mailing or delivery of a
decision of the department of social services or its designated division or unitin which to file
his or her petition for review with the administrative hearing commission except that claims
of less than five hundred dollars may be accumulated until they total that sum and at which
time the provider shall have ninety days to file his or her petition.
9. When a person entitled to a hearing as provided for in this section applies to the
administrative hearing commission for a stay order staying the actions of the department of
social services or its divisions or units, the administrative hearing commission shall not grant
such stay order until after a full hearing on such application. The application shall be
advanced on the docket for immediate hearing and determination. The person applying for
such stay order shall not be granted such stay order unless that person shall show that

HB 2538 5
immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage will result if such stay order is denied, or
that such person has a reasonable likelihood of success upon the merits of his or her claim;
and provided further that no stay order shall be issued without the person seeking such order
posting a bond in such sum as the administrative hearing commission finds sufficient to
protect and preserve the interest of the department of social services or its divisions or units.
[In no event may the administrative hearing commission grant such stay order where the
claim arises under a program or programs funded by federal funds or by any combination of
state and federal funds, unless it is specified in writing by the financial section of the
appropriate federal agency that federal financial participation will be continued under the stay
order.]
10. The other provisions of this section notwithstanding, a person receiving or
providing benefits shall have the right to bring an action in appealing from the administrative
hearing commission in the circuit court of Cole County, Missouri, or the county of his or her
residence pursuant to section 536.050.
✔